Missouri, session 2026, SB1010.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 210.115, 568.045, 568.050, 568.060,
and 578.421, RSMo, are repealed and five new sections enacted
in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 210.115, 568.045,
568.050, 568.060, and 578.421, to read as follows:
210.115. 1. When any physician, medical examiner,
coroner, dentist, chiropractor, optometrist, podiatrist,
resident, intern, nurse, hospital or clinic personnel that
are engaged in the examination, care, treatment or research
of persons, and any other health practitioner, psychologist,
mental health professional, social worker, day care center
worker or other child-care worker, juvenile officer,
probation or parole officer, jail or detention center
personnel, teacher, principal or other school official,
minister as provided by section 352.400, peace officer or
law enforcement official, volunteer or personnel of a
community service program that offers support services for
families in crisis to assist in the delegation of any powers
regarding the care and custody of a child by a properly
executed power of attorney pursuant to sections 475.600 to
475.604, or other person with responsibility for the care of
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1010 2
children has reasonable cause to suspect that a child has
been or may be subjected to abuse or neglect or observes a
child being subjected to conditions or circumstances which
would reasonably result in abuse or neglect, that person
shall immediately report to the division in accordance with
the provisions of sections 210.109 to 210.183. No internal
investigation shall be initiated until such a report has
been made. As used in this section, the term "abuse" is not
limited to abuse inflicted by a person responsible for the
child's care, custody and control as specified in section
210.110, but shall also include abuse inflicted by any other
person.
2. If two or more members of a medical institution who
are required to report jointly have knowledge of a known or
suspected instance of child abuse or neglect, a single
report may be made by a designated member of that medical
team. Any member who has knowledge that the member
designated to report has failed to do so shall thereafter
immediately make the report. Nothing in this section,
however, is meant to preclude any person from reporting
abuse or neglect.
3. The reporting requirements under this section are
individual, and no supervisor or administrator may impede or
inhibit any reporting under this section. No person making
a report under this section shall be subject to any
sanction, including any adverse employment action, for
making such report. Every employer shall ensure that any
employee required to report pursuant to subsection 1 of this
section has immediate and unrestricted access to
communications technology necessary to make an immediate
report and is temporarily relieved of other work duties for

SB 1010 3
such time as is required to make any report required under
subsection 1 of this section.
4. Notwithstanding any other provision of sections
210.109 to 210.183[,] to the contrary:
(1) Any child who does not receive specified medical
treatment by reason of the legitimate practice of the
religious belief of the child's parents, guardian, or others
legally responsible for the child, for that reason alone,
shall not be found to be an abused or neglected child, and
such parents, guardian or other persons legally responsible
for the child shall not be entered into the central
registry. However, the division may accept reports
concerning such a child and may subsequently investigate or
conduct a family assessment as a result of that report, but
shall not investigate or conduct a family assessment for the
sole reason that the child's parent, guardian, or other
person responsible for the child's care, custody, and
control refuses to affirm or otherwise recognize the child's
sexual orientation or gender identity if such identity
differs from the child's biological sex, as such term is
defined in section 191.1720, or if he or she refuses to
assist or consent to the child's gender transition, as such
term is defined in section 191.1720. Such an exception
shall not limit the administrative or judicial authority of
the state to ensure that medical services are provided to
the child when the child's health requires it; provided,
that such medical services shall not include services
prohibited under section 191.1720;
(2) A child shall not be considered abused or
neglected for the sole reason that the child's parent,
guardian, or other person responsible for the child's care,
custody, and control refuses to affirm or otherwise

SB 1010 4
recognize the child's sexual orientation or gender identity
if such identity differs from the child's biological sex, as
such term is defined in section 191.1720, and such parent,
guardian, or other person responsible for the child's care,
custody, and control shall not be entered into the central
registry. The division shall not investigate or conduct a
family assessment for the sole reason that the child's
parent, guardian, or other person responsible for the
child's care, custody, and control refuses to affirm or
otherwise recognize the child's sexual orientation or gender
identity if such identity differs from the child's
biological sex, as such term is defined in section 191.1720.
5. In addition to those persons and officials required
to report actual or suspected abuse or neglect, any other
person may report in accordance with sections 210.109 to
210.183 if such person has reasonable cause to suspect that
a child has been or may be subjected to abuse or neglect or
observes a child being subjected to conditions or
circumstances which would reasonably result in abuse or
neglect.
100 6. Any person or official required to report pursuant
101 to this section, including employees of the division, who
102 has probable cause to suspect that a child who is or may be
103 under the age of eighteen, who is eligible to receive a
104 certificate of live birth, has died shall report that fact
105 to the appropriate medical examiner or coroner. If, upon
106 review of the circumstances and medical information, the
107 medical examiner or coroner determines that the child died
108 of natural causes while under medical care for an
109 established natural disease, the coroner, medical examiner
110 or physician shall notify the division of the child's death
111 and that the child's attending physician shall be signing

SB 1010 5
112 the death certificate. In all other cases, the medical
113 examiner or coroner shall accept the report for
114 investigation, shall immediately notify the division of the
115 child's death as required in section 58.452 and shall report
116 the findings to the child fatality review panel established
117 pursuant to section 210.192.
118 7. Any person or individual required to report may
119 also report the suspicion of abuse or neglect to any law
120 enforcement agency or juvenile office. Such report shall
121 not, however, take the place of reporting to the division.
122 8. If an individual required to report suspected
123 instances of abuse or neglect pursuant to this section has
124 reason to believe that the victim of such abuse or neglect
125 is a resident of another state or was injured as a result of
126 an act which occurred in another state, the person required
127 to report such abuse or neglect may, in lieu of reporting to
128 the Missouri children's division, make such a report to the
129 child protection agency of the other state with the
130 authority to receive such reports pursuant to the laws of
131 such other state. If such agency accepts the report, no
132 report is required to be made, but may be made, to the
133 children's division.
134 9. For the purposes of providing supportive services
135 or verifying the status of a youth as unaccompanied or
136 homeless for the purposes of accessing supportive services,
137 the fact that a child is an unaccompanied youth as defined
138 in 42 U.S.C. Section 11434a(6) is not, in and of itself, a
139 sufficient basis for reporting child abuse or neglect,
140 unless the child is under sixteen years of age or is an
141 incapacitated person, as defined in section 475.010.
142 Nothing in this subsection shall limit a mandated reporter
143 from making a report under this section if the mandated

SB 1010 6
144 reporter knows or has reasonable cause to suspect that an
145 unaccompanied youth has been or may be a victim of abuse or
146 neglect.
568.045. 1. A person commits the offense of
endangering the welfare of a child in the first degree if he
or she:
(1) Knowingly acts in a manner that creates a
substantial risk to the life, body, or health of a child
less than seventeen years of age;
(2) Knowingly engages in sexual conduct with a person
under the age of eighteen years over whom the person is a
parent, guardian, or otherwise charged with the care and
custody;
(3) Knowingly encourages, aids or causes a child less
than seventeen years of age to engage in any conduct which
violates the provisions of chapter 571 or 579; or
(4) In the presence of a child less than seventeen
years of age or in a residence where a child less than
seventeen years of age resides, unlawfully manufactures or
attempts to manufacture compounds, possesses, produces,
prepares, sells, transports, tests or analyzes any of the
following: fentanyl, carfentanil, amphetamine, or
methamphetamine, or any analogue thereof.
2. The offense of endangering the welfare of a child
in the first degree is a class D felony unless the offense:
(1) Is committed as part of an act or series of acts
performed by two or more persons as part of an established
or prescribed pattern of activity, or where physical injury
to the child results, or the offense is a second or
subsequent offense under this section, in which case the
offense is a class C felony;

SB 1010 7
(2) Involves fentanyl or carfentanil, or any analogue
thereof, in which case:
(a) The offense is a class B felony; and
(b) A person sentenced under this subdivision shall
not be eligible for conditional release or parole until he
or she has served at least five years of imprisonment;
(3) Results in serious physical injury to the child,
in which case the offense is a class B felony; or
(4) Results in the death of a child, in which case the
offense is a class A felony.
3. A person does not commit the offense of endangering
the welfare of a child in the first degree if he or she
refuses to affirm or recognize a child's sexual orientation
or gender identity if such identity differs from the child's
biological sex, as such term is defined in section 191.1720,
or if he or she refuses to assist or consent to a child's
gender transition, as such term is defined in section
191.1720.
568.050. 1. A person commits the offense of
endangering the welfare of a child in the second degree if
he or she:
(1) With criminal negligence acts in a manner that
creates a substantial risk to the life, body or health of a
child less than seventeen years of age; or
(2) Knowingly encourages, aids or causes a child less
than seventeen years of age to engage in any conduct which
causes or tends to cause the child to come within the
provisions of paragraph (d) of subdivision (2) of subsection
1 or subdivision (3) of subsection 1 of section 211.031; or
(3) Being a parent, guardian or other person legally
charged with the care or custody of a child less than
seventeen years of age, recklessly fails or refuses to

SB 1010 8
exercise reasonable diligence in the care or control of such
child to prevent him or her from coming within the
provisions of paragraph (c) of subdivision (1) of subsection
1 or paragraph (d) of subdivision (2) of subsection 1 or
subdivision (3) of subsection 1 of section 211.031; or
(4) Knowingly encourages, aids or causes a child less
than seventeen years of age to enter into any room, building
or other structure which is a public nuisance as defined in
section 579.105.
2. Nothing in this section shall be construed to mean
the welfare of a child is endangered for the sole reason
that he or she is being provided nonmedical remedial
treatment recognized and permitted under the laws of this
state.
3. The offense of endangering the welfare of a child
in the second degree is a class A misdemeanor unless the
offense is committed as part of an act or series of acts
performed by two or more persons as part of an established
or prescribed pattern of activity, in which case the offense
is a class E felony.
4. A person does not commit the offense of endangering
the welfare of a child in the second degree if he or she
refuses to affirm or recognize a child's sexual orientation
or gender identity if such identity differs from the child's
biological sex, as such term is defined in section 191.1720,
or if he or she refuses to assist or consent to a child's
gender transition, as such term is defined in section
191.1720.
568.060. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms shall mean:
(1) "Abuse", the infliction of physical, sexual, or
mental injury against a child by any person eighteen years

SB 1010 9
of age or older. For purposes of this section, abuse shall
not include injury inflicted on a child by accidental means
by a person with care, custody, or control of the child, or
discipline of a child by a person with care, custody, or
control of the child, including spanking, in a reasonable
manner;
(2) "Abusive head trauma", a serious physical injury
to the head or brain caused by any means, including but not
limited to shaking, jerking, pushing, pulling, slamming,
hitting, or kicking;
(3) "Mental injury", an injury to the intellectual or
psychological capacity or the emotional condition of a child
as evidenced by an observable and substantial impairment of
the ability of the child to function within his or her
normal range of performance or behavior;
(4) "Neglect", the failure to provide, by those
responsible for the care, custody, and control of a child
under the age of eighteen years, the care reasonable and
necessary to maintain the physical and mental health of the
child, when such failure presents a substantial probability
that death or physical injury or sexual injury would result;
(5) "Physical injury", physical pain, illness, or any
impairment of physical condition, including but not limited
to bruising, lacerations, hematomas, welts, or permanent or
temporary disfigurement and impairment of any bodily
function or organ;
(6) "Serious emotional injury", an injury that creates
a substantial risk of temporary or permanent medical or
psychological damage, manifested by impairment of a
behavioral, cognitive, or physical condition. Serious
emotional injury shall be established by testimony of
qualified experts upon the reasonable expectation of

SB 1010 10
probable harm to a reasonable degree of medical or
psychological certainty;
(7) "Serious physical injury", a physical injury that
creates a substantial risk of death or that causes serious
disfigurement or protracted loss or impairment of the
function of any part of the body.
2. A person commits the offense of abuse or neglect of
a child if such person knowingly causes a child who is less
than eighteen years of age:
(1) To suffer physical or mental injury as a result of
abuse or neglect; or
(2) To be placed in a situation in which the child may
suffer physical or mental injury as the result of abuse or
neglect.
3. A person commits the offense of abuse or neglect of
a child if such person recklessly causes a child who is less
than eighteen years of age to suffer from abusive head
trauma.
4. A person does not commit the offense of abuse or
neglect of a child by virtue of the sole fact that the
person delivers or allows the delivery of a child to a
provider of emergency services.
5. (1) A person does not commit the offense of abuse
or neglect of a child by virtue of the sole fact that the
person allows the child to engage in independent activities
without adult supervision and the person is a parent to the
child or is responsible for the child's care, provided that
the:
(a) Independent activities are appropriate based on
the child's age, maturity, and physical and mental
abilities; and

SB 1010 11
(b) Lack of adult supervision does not constitute
conduct that is so grossly negligent as to endanger the
health or safety of the child.
(2) As used in this subsection, "independent
activities" shall include traveling to or from school or
nearby locations by bicycle or on foot, playing outdoors, or
remaining at home for a reasonable period of time without
adult supervision.
6. A person does not commit the offense of abuse or
neglect of a child by virtue of the sole fact that the
person refuses to affirm or otherwise recognize a child's
sexual orientation or gender identity if such identity
differs from the child's biological sex, as such term is
defined in section 191.1720.
7. The offense of abuse or neglect of a child is:
(1) A class D felony, without eligibility for
probation, parole, or conditional release until the
defendant has served no less than one year of such sentence,
unless the person has previously been found guilty of a
violation of this section or of a violation of the law of
any other jurisdiction that prohibits the same or similar
conduct or the injury inflicted on the child is a serious
emotional injury or a serious physical injury, in which case
abuse or neglect of a child is a class B felony, without
eligibility for probation or parole until the defendant has
served not less than five years of such sentence; or
(2) A class A felony if the child dies as a result of
injuries sustained from conduct chargeable under the
provisions of this section.
[7.] 8. Notwithstanding subsection [6] 7 of this
section to the contrary, the offense of abuse or neglect of
a child is a class A felony, without eligibility for

SB 1010 12
100 probation, parole, or conditional release until the
101 defendant has served not less than fifteen years of such
102 sentence, if:
103 (1) The injury is a serious emotional injury or a
104 serious physical injury;
105 (2) The child is less than fourteen years of age; and
106 (3) The injury is the result of sexual abuse or sexual
107 abuse in the first degree as defined under section 566.100
108 or sexual exploitation of a minor as defined under section
109 573.023.
110 [8.] 9. The circuit or prosecuting attorney may refer a
111 person who is suspected of abuse or neglect of a child to an
112 appropriate public or private agency for treatment or
113 counseling so long as the agency has consented to taking
114 such referrals. Nothing in this subsection shall limit the
115 discretion of the circuit or prosecuting attorney to
116 prosecute a person who has been referred for treatment or
117 counseling pursuant to this subsection.
118 [9.] 10. Nothing in this section shall be construed to
119 alter the requirement that every element of any crime
120 referred to herein must be proven beyond a reasonable doubt.
121 [10.] 11. Discipline, including spanking administered
122 in a reasonable manner, shall not be construed to be abuse
123 under this section.
578.421. 1. Sections 578.421 to 578.437 shall be
known and may be cited as the "Missouri Criminal Street
Gangs Prevention Act".
2. As used in sections 578.421 to 578.437, the
following terms mean:
(1) "Criminal street gang", any ongoing organization,
association, or group of three or more persons, whether
formal or informal, having as one of its motivating

SB 1010 13
activities the commission of one or more of the criminal
acts enumerated in subdivision (2) of this subsection, whose
members individually or collectively engage in or have
engaged in a pattern of criminal gang activity;
(2) "Pattern of criminal street gang activity", the
commission, attempted commission, or solicitation of two or
more of the following offenses, provided at least one of
those offenses occurred after August 28, 1993, and the last
of those offenses occurred within three years after a prior
offense, and the offenses are committed on separate
occasions, or by two or more persons:
(a) Assault with a deadly weapon or by means of force
likely to cause serious physical injury, as provided in
sections 565.050 and 565.052;
(b) Robbery, arson and those offenses under chapter
569 which are related to robbery and arson;
(c) Murder or manslaughter, as provided in sections
565.020 to 565.024;
(d) Any violation of the provisions of chapter 579
which involves the distribution, delivery or manufacture of
a substance prohibited by chapter 579;
(e) Unlawful use of a weapon which is a felony
pursuant to section 571.030;
(f) Tampering with witnesses and victims, as provided
in section 575.270;
(g) Promoting online sexual solicitation, as provided
in section 566.103;
(h) Sexual trafficking of a child in the first degree,
as provided in section 566.210;
(i) Sexual trafficking of a child in the second
degree, as provided in section 566.211;

SB 1010 14
(j) Patronizing prostitution, as provided in
subsection 4 of section 567.030;
(k) Promoting prostitution in the first degree, as
provided in section 567.050;
(l) Promoting prostitution in the second degree, as
provided in section 567.060;
(m) Abuse or neglect of a child, as provided in
subsection [7] 8 of section 568.060;
(n) Sexual exploitation of a minor, as provided in
section 573.023;
(o) Child used in sexual performance, as provided in
section 573.200;
(p) Promoting sexual performance by a child, as
provided in section 573.205; or
(q) Any dangerous felony, as defined in section
556.061.
✓